src/backend/tsearch/dicts/hunspell_sample_num.affix
FLAG num

COMPOUNDFLAG 101
ONLYINCOMPOUND 102

PFX 201 Y 1
PFX 201   0	re	.

PFX 202 N 1
PFX 202   0	un	.

SFX 301 Y 1
SFX 301   0	INGS	[^E]

SFX 302 Y 1
SFX 302   0	ING		[^E]

SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303   0	S	[^SXZHY]

# Remove ED suffix from lexeme for base words with K ending
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306   0	ED	K{1}

# Just add Y to lexeme for base words with Y ending
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307   Y	0	Y*

SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304   Y	IES	[^AEIOU]Y

SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305   0	Y/102	[^Y]
